Illinois, session 104th, SB2544.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 7Department of Healthcare and Family Services for the purposes 8hereinafter named:9PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION10Payable from General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services............................20,320,50012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security..................................1,554,50014  For Contractual Services..........................1,760,10015  For Travel..........................................101,20016  For Commodities...........................................017  For Printing..............................................018  For Equipment.............................................019  For Electronic Data Processing...................13,165,00020  For Telecommunications Services...........................021  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................34,00022  For Deposit into the Public Aid23   Recoveries Trust Fund...........................52,495,000  SB2544- 2 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1    Total                                         $89,430,3002Payable from the HFS Technology Initiative Fund:3  For Costs Associated with the Illinois4   Health and Human Services Innovation5   Incubator Program, including Operational6   and Administrative Costs........................15,000,0007Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:8  For Personal Services.............................4,473,8009  For State Contributions to State10   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,079,60011  For State Contributions to12   Social Security....................................342,30013  For Group Insurance...............................1,365,90014  For Contractual Services..........................5,343,00015  For Commodities.....................................232,60016  For Printing........................................360,70017  For Equipment.....................................1,166,30018  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,620,80019  For Telecommunications Services...................1,185,00020  For Costs Associated with Information 21   Technology Infrastructure.......................54,754,00022  For State Prompt Payment Act Interest Costs..........25,00023    Total                                         $73,949,00024OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL25Payable from General Revenue Fund:26  For Personal Services.............................6,690,800  SB2544- 3 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1  For State Contributions to2   Social Security....................................511,8003  For Contractual Services..................................04  For Travel...........................................40,0005  For Equipment............................................ 06    Total                                          $7,242,6007Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:8  For Administrative Expenses.........................282,0009Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:10  For Personal Services............................11,241,40011  For State Contributions to State12   Employees' Retirement System.....................5,225,70013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security....................................860,00015  For Group Insurance...............................3,652,00016  For Contractual Services..........................7,918,50017  For Travel..........................................108,80018  For Commodities...........................................019  For Printing..............................................020  For Equipment.............................................021  For Telecommunications Services...........................022    Total                                         $29,006,40023CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES24Payable from General Revenue Fund:25  For Deposit into the Child Support26   Administrative Fund.............................71,800,000  SB2544- 4 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1Payable from Child Support Administrative Fund:2  For Personal Services............................61,743,1003  For State Contributions to State4   Employees' Retirement System....................28,701,9005  For State Contributions to 6   Social Security..................................4,723,3007  For Group Insurance..............................25,696,8008  For Contractual Services.........................89,350,7009  For Travel..........................................140,70010  For Commodities.....................................292,00011  For Printing........................................360,00012  For Equipment.....................................1,553,10013  For Electronic Data Processing...................15,447,20014  For Telecommunications Services...................1,900,00015  For Child Support Enforcement16   Demonstration Projects.............................500,00017  For Administrative Costs Related to18   Enhanced Collection Efforts including19   Paternity Adjudication Demonstration.............7,500,00020  For Costs Related to the State21   Disbursement Unit................................9,000,00022  For State Prompt Payment Act Interest Costs..........50,00023    Total                                        $246,958,80024PUBLIC AID RECOVERIES25Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:26  For Personal Services............................10,502,600  SB2544- 5 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1  For State Contributions to State2   Employees' Retirement System.....................4,882,2003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security....................................803,4005  For Group Insurance...............................3,735,5006  For Contractual Services.........................12,898,6007  For Travel..........................................107,2008  For Commodities...........................................09  For Printing..............................................010  For Equipment.............................................011  For Telecommunications Services...........................012    Total                                         $32,929,50013MEDICAL14Payable from General Revenue Fund:15  For Deposit into the Medicaid Technical16   Assistance Center Fund.............................500,00017  For Costs Associated with the Critical18   Access Care Pharmacy Program....................10,000,00019    Total                                         $10,500,00020Payable from Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund:21  For Personal Services............................15,152,00022  For State Contributions to State23   Employees' Retirement System.....................7,043,60024  For State Contributions to25   Social Security..................................1,159,30026  For Group Insurance...............................5,628,800  SB2544- 6 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1  For Contractual Services.........................45,746,8002  For Commodities...........................................03  For Printing..............................................04  For Equipment.............................................05  For Telecommunications Services...........................06  For Costs Associated with the7   Development, Implementation and8   Operation of a Data Warehouse...................21,368,2009    Total                                         $96,098,70010Payable from Healthcare Provider Relief Fund:11  For Operational Expenses.........................68,790,60012  For Payments in Support of the13   Operation of the Illinois14   Poison Center....................................4,500,000 15    Section 10. The amount of $2,957,000,000, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department 17of Healthcare and Family Services from the General Revenue 18Fund for deposit into the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund. 19    Section 15. In addition to any amounts heretofore 20appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 22Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 23Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:24Payable from General Revenue Fund:  SB2544- 7 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1  For Medical Assistance Providers and2   Related Operating and Administrative3   Costs.......................................$6,077,606,900 4   The amount of $0, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 5appropriated to the Department of Healthcare and Family 6Services from the General Revenue Fund for Medical Assistance 7pursuant to subsections (a-6) and (a-7) of Section 12-4.35 of 8the Illinois Public Aid Code. 9   The amount of $110,000,000, or so much thereof as may be 10necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Healthcare and 11Family Services from the General Revenue Fund for Medical 12Assistance pursuant to subsection (a-5) of Section 12-4.35 of 13the Illinois Public Aid Code. 14   In addition to any amounts heretofore appropriated, the 15following named amounts, or so much thereof as may be 16necessary, are appropriated to the Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services for Medical Assistance for reimbursement 18or coverage of prescribed drugs, other pharmacy products, and 19payments to managed care organizations including related 20administrative and operation costs:21Payable from Drug Rebate Fund...................2,000,000,000 22   In addition to any amounts heretofore appropriated, the   SB2544- 8 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1following named amounts, or so much thereof as may be 2necessary, are appropriated to the Department of Healthcare 3and Family Services for costs related to the operation of the 4Health Benefits for Workers with Disabilities Program:5Payable from Medicaid Buy-In Program 6 Revolving Fund.......................................837,000 7    Section 20. In addition to any amount heretofore 8appropriated, the amount of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 10Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Interagency 11Program Fund for i) Medical Assistance payments on behalf of 12individuals eligible for Medical Assistance programs 13administered by the Department of Healthcare and Family 14Services, and ii) pursuant to an interagency agreement, 15medical services and other costs associated with programs 16administered by another agency of state government, including 17operating and administrative costs. 18    Section 25. In addition to any amounts heretofore 19appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 21Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 22Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:23Payable from Care Provider Fund for Persons 24 with a Developmental Disability:  SB2544- 9 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1  For Administrative Expenditures.....................300,0002Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:3  For Skilled, Intermediate, and Other Related 4   Long-Term Care Services and Payments5   to Managed Care Organizations..................875,000,0006  For Administrative Expenditures...................6,109,6007    Total                                        $881,109,6008Payable from Hospital Provider Fund:9  For Hospitals, Capitated Managed Care10   Organizations as necessary to comply11   with Article V-A of the12   Illinois Public Aid Code, and Related 13   Operating and Administrative Costs...........7,300,000,00014Payable from Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:15  For Medical Assistance Providers................800,000,00016Payable from Healthcare Provider Relief Fund:17  For Medical Assistance Providers18   and Related Operating and19   Administrative Costs........................19,818,000,00020  For Medical Assistance Pursuant to21   subsections (a-6) and (a-7) of Section 12-4.3522   of the Illinois Public Aid Code..........................023  For Medical Assistance Pursuant to24   subsection (a-5) of Section 12-4.3525   of the Illinois Public Aid Code................132,000,00026    Total                                     $19,950,000,000   SB2544- 10 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1    Section 30. In addition to any amounts heretofore 2appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 4Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 5Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:6Payable from County Provider Trust Fund:7  For Medical Services..........................3,500,000,0008  For Administrative Expenditures Including9   Pass-through of Federal Matching Funds..........25,000,00010    Total                                      $3,525,000,000 11    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 13the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for refunds 14of overpayments of assessments or inter-governmental transfers 15made by providers during the period from July 1, 1991 through 16June 30, 2025:17Payable from:18  Care Provider Fund for Persons19   with a Developmental Disability..................1,000,00020  Long-Term Care Provider Fund......................2,750,00021  Hospital Provider Fund............................5,000,00022  County Provider Trust Fund........................1,000,00023    Total                                          $9,750,000   SB2544- 11 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1    Section 40. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 3Healthcare and Family Services from the Trauma Center Fund for 4adjustment payments to certain Level I and Level II trauma 5centers. 6    Section 45. The amount of $375,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services from the University of Illinois 9Hospital Services Fund to reimburse the University of Illinois 10Hospital for medical services. 11    Section 50. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Special 14Purposes Trust Fund for medical demonstration projects and 15costs associated with the implementation of federal Health 16Insurance Portability and Accountability Act mandates. 17    Section 55. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 19Healthcare and Family Services from the Medicaid Technical 20Assistance Center Fund for all costs, including grants and 21related operating and administrative costs, associated with 22the establishment, administration, and operations of the 23Medicaid Technical Assistance Center.   SB2544- 12 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1    Section 60. The amount of $400,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 3Healthcare and Family Services from the Special Education 4Medicaid Matching Fund for payments to local education 5agencies for medical services and other costs eligible for 6federal reimbursement under Title XIX or Title XXI of the 7federal Social Security Act. 8    Section 65. In addition to any amounts heretofore 9appropriated, the amount of $10,200,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 11Healthcare and Family Services from the Money Follows the 12Person Budget Transfer Fund for costs associated with 13long-term care, including related operating and administrative 14costs. Such costs shall include, but not necessarily be 15limited to, those related to long-term care rebalancing 16efforts, institutional long-term care services, and pursuant 17to an interagency agreement, community-based services 18administered by another agency of state government. 19    Section 70. The amount of $8,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 21Healthcare and Family Services from the Illinois Health 22Benefits Exchange Fund for all costs, including but not 23limited to grants, outreach, operations, and administrative   SB2544- 13 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1expenses associated with the establishment and operation of 2the Illinois Health Benefits Exchange and coordinating 3operations of the Exchange with State medical assistance 4programs. 5    Section 75. In addition to any amounts heretofore 6appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 8Department of Healthcare and Family Services for State Prompt 9Payment Act interest costs:10Payable from the General Revenue Fund...............5,000,00011Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:.............10,00012Payable from the Hospital Provider Fund:..............200,00013Payable from the Trauma Center Fund:...................10,00014Payable from the Money Follows the Person 15 Budget Transfer Fund:.................................10,00016Payable from the Medical Interagency 17 Program Fund:........................................200,00018Payable from the Drug Rebate Fund:....................200,00019Payable from the Tobacco Settlement 20 Recovery Fund:........................................10,00021Payable from the Medicaid Buy-In Program 22 Revolving Fund:..........................................50023Payable from the Healthcare  24 Provider Relief Fund:..............................5,000,00025Payable from the Medical Special   SB2544- 14 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1 Purposes Trust Fund:..................................50,000 2    Section 80. The amount of $25,000,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for 5the purpose of updating prospective payment system rates for 6Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs). 7    Section 85. The amount of $60,000,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 9business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 10made for such purpose in Article 69, Section 90 of Public Act 11103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 12Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Special 13Purposes Trust Fund for a demonstration project for preventive 14health. 15    Section 90. The amount of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for 18the purpose of administering the Breakthrough Therapies for 19Veteran Suicide Prevention Program including but not limited 20to, academic and medical institutions for purposes of studying 21emerging therapies. 22    Section 95. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof   SB2544- 15 -OMB104 00040 JCB 10040 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 2Healthcare and Family Services from the Medical Debt Relief 3Pilot Program Fund for grants and administrative costs 4associated with a pilot program for the purchase of medical 5debt incurred by patients. 6    Section 100. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services from the General Revenue Fund 9for grants and administrative costs to Thorek Memorial 10Hospital for ordinary and contingent expenses associated with 11Project On-Ramp. 12    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.